Hawaii statutes.
§339D-8 Enforcement. (a) The
department may conduct audits and inspections to determine compliance under
this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (c), the department and the
attorney general shall be empowered to enforce this chapter and take necessary
action against any electronic device or television manufacturer or retailer for
failure to comply with this chapter or rules adopted thereunder.

(b) The attorney general may file suit in the
name of the State to enjoin an activity related to the sale of covered
electronic devices or covered televisions in violation of this chapter.

(c) The department shall issue a warning
notice to a person for the person's first violation of this chapter. The
person shall comply with this chapter within sixty days of the date the warning
notice was issued or be subject to the penalties provided by law or rule,
including, but not limited to, penalties set forth in subsections (d) through
(g). A retailer that receives a warning notice from the department for a violation
of section 339D-3(a) or 339D-24(a) shall submit proof to the department, within
sixty days from the date the warning notice was issued, that its inventory of
covered electronic devices or covered televisions offered for sale is in
compliance with this chapter.

(d) Any retailer who sells or offers for sale
an unlabeled electronic device or unlabeled covered television in violation of
section 339D-3 or 339D-24, respectively, or any electronic device or television
manufacturer that fails to comply with any provision of section 339D-4 or 339D-23,
respectively, may be assessed a penalty of up to $10,000 for the first
violation and up to $25,000 for the second and each subsequent violation, in
addition to any additional penalties required or imposed pursuant to this
chapter.

(e) Except as provided in subsection (d), any
person who violates any requirement of this chapter may be assessed a penalty
of up to $1,000 for the first violation and up to $2,000 for the second and
each subsequent violation, in addition to any additional penalties required or
imposed pursuant to this chapter.

(f) The department shall determine additional
penalties based on adverse impact to the environment, unfair competitive
advantage, and other considerations that the department deems appropriate.

(g) If a covered television manufacturer fails
to recycle its market share allocation, the department shall impose a penalty
of 50 cents per pound for each pound not recycled. [L Sp 2008, c 13, pt
of §2; am L 2009, c 183, §12]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next